New Jersey, session 222, A4417.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The board of trustees of a county college shall post on its website: the employment contract between the board and the president of the college; and any payments, emoluments, or allowances provided to the president in addition to the salary and benefits paid under the contract. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall be applicable to employment contracts entered into on or after the effective date of this act.